Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.075

Interim permits.

(1) The department, upon approval by the board, shall issue an interim permit authorizing an applicant for licensure who meets the minimum qualifications stated in RCW 18.74.030 to practice physical therapy under graduate supervision pending notification of the results of the first licensure examination for which the applicant is eligible, but not to exceed six months.

(2) For purposes of this section, "graduate supervision" means supervision of a holder of an interim permit by a licensed physical therapist who is on the premises at all times. Graduate supervision shall include consultation regarding evaluation, treatment plan, treatment program, and progress of each assigned patient at appropriate intervals and be documented by cosignature of notes by the licensed physical therapist. RCW 18.74.012 is not applicable for holders of interim permits.

(3) If the holder of the interim permit fails the examination, the permit expires upon notification and is not renewable.

[ 1993 c 133 s 1.]